District of Columbia statutes.
8-503

Label requirements.

The label required by § 8-502 shall consist of a tag which shall be sewed or otherwise securely attached to the mattress. In case the mattress has not been renovated the label shall contain in plain, legible print in the English language a statement showing: (1) the name and address of the manufacturer; (2) a description of the materials used in the manufacture of such mattress; and (3) whether such materials are in whole or in part secondhand. In case the mattress has been renovated the label shall contain in such print the word “Renovated” and a statement of: (1) the name and address of the renovator; and (2) a description of the materials used in the renovated mattress. For the purposes of this chapter the materials so used shall be described in such manner as the Council of the District of Columbia shall by regulation prescribe.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 839, ch. 768, § 3
This section is referenced in § 8-502.
1981 Ed., § 6-803.
1973 Ed., § 6-603.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(142) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.